Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB960.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Sections 401(a), 406(a)(4), 407(a)(1), 442(a)(1)(i), 492(7) and 499(a.1)(4) of the act of April 12, 1951 (P.L.90, No.21), known as the Liquor Code, are amended to read:1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829 Section 401. Authority to Issue Liquor Licenses to Hotels, Restaurants and Clubs.--(a) Subject to the provisions of this act and regulations promulgated under this act, the board shall have authority to issue a retail liquor license for any premises kept or operated by a hotel, restaurant or club and specified in the license entitling the hotel, restaurant or club to purchase liquor from a Pennsylvania Liquor Store and to keep on the premises such liquor and, subject to the provisions of this act and the regulations made thereunder, to sell the same and also malt or brewed beverages to guests, patrons or members for consumption on the hotel, restaurant or club premises. Such licensees[, other than clubs,] shall be permitted to sell malt or brewed beverages for consumption off the premises where sold in quantities of not more than one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces in a single sale to one person as provided for in section 407. Such licenses shall be known as hotel liquor licenses, restaurant liquor licenses and club liquor licenses, respectively. No person who holds any public office that involves the duty to enforce any of the penal laws of the United States, this Commonwealth or of any political subdivision of this Commonwealth may have any interest in a hotel or restaurant liquor license. This prohibition applies to anyone with arrest authority, including, but not limited to, United States attorneys, State attorneys general, district attorneys, sheriffs and police officers. This prohibition shall also apply to magisterial district judges, judges or any other individuals who can impose a criminal sentence. This prohibition does not apply to members of the General Assembly, township supervisors, city councilpersons, mayors without arrest authority and any other public official who does not have the ability to arrest or the 20250SB0960PN1079 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 ability to impose a criminal sentence. This section does not apply if the proposed premises are located outside the jurisdiction of the individual in question.* * *Section 406. Sales by Liquor Licensees; Restrictions.--(a) * * *(4) (i) Hotel and restaurant liquor licensees, municipal golf course restaurant liquor licensees and privately-owned public golf course restaurant licensees which do not qualify for and purchase such special permit, their servants, agents or employes may sell liquor and malt or brewed beverages only after seven o'clock antemeridian of any day and until two o'clock antemeridian of the following day, and shall not sell after two o'clock antemeridian on Sunday. No club licensee or its servants, agents or employes may sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages between the hours of three o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day. No public service liquor licensee or its servants, agents, or employes may sell liquor or malt or brewed beverages between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.(ii) No club licensee or its servants, agents or employes may sell malt or brewed beverages for off-premises consumption between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.* * *Section 407. Sale of Malt or Brewed Beverages by Liquor Licensees.--(a) (1) Every liquor license issued to a hotel, restaurant, club, or a railroad, pullman or steamship company under this subdivision (A) for the sale of liquor shall authorize the licensee to sell malt or brewed beverages at the 20250SB0960PN1079 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 same places but subject to the same restrictions and penalties as apply to sales of liquor, except that licensees [other than clubs] may sell malt or brewed beverages for consumption off the premises where sold in quantities of not more than one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces in a single sale to one person. The sales may be made in either open or closed containers, Provided, however, That a municipality may adopt an ordinance restricting open containers in public places. No licensee under this subdivision (A) shall at the same time be the holder of any other class of license, except a retail dispenser's license authorizing the sale of malt or brewed beverages only. Sales of malt or brewed beverages must occur on the licensed premises.* * *Section 442. Retail Dispensers' Restrictions on Purchases and Sales.--(a) (1) (i) No retail dispenser shall purchase or receive any malt or brewed beverages except in original containers as prepared for the market by the manufacturer at the place of manufacture. The retail dispenser may thereafter break the bulk upon the licensed premises and sell or dispense the same for consumption on or off the premises so licensed. No retail dispenser may sell malt or brewed beverages for consumption off the premises in quantities in excess of one hundred ninety-two fluid ounces. Sales may be made in open or closed containers, Provided, however, That a municipality may adopt an ordinance restricting open containers in public places. No club licensee may sell any malt or brewed beverages for consumption off the premises [where sold or] to persons not members of the club. Sales of malt or brewed beverages must occur on the licensed premises.* * *20250SB0960PN1079 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Section 492. Unlawful Acts Relative to Malt or Brewed Beverages and Licensees.--It shall be unlawful--* * *(7) (i) Clubs Selling Between Three O'Clock Antemeridian and Seven O'Clock Antemeridian. For any club retail dispenser, or its servants, agents or employes, to sell malt or brewed beverages between the hours of three o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.(ii) Clubs Selling Malt or Brewed Beverages for Off-Premises Consumption between Two O'Clock Antemeridian and Seven O'Clock Antemeridian. For any club retail dispenser or its servants, agents or employes, to sell malt or brewed beverages for off-premises consumption between the hours of two o'clock antemeridian and seven o'clock antemeridian on any day.* * *Section 499. Premises to be Vacated by Patrons.--* * *(a.1) Subsection (a) shall not apply to sales of malt and brewed beverages for consumption off the premises when the following conditions are met:* * *(4) no club licensee may sell any malt or brewed beverage for consumption off the premises [where sold or] to any persons who are not members of the club.* * *Section 2. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250SB0960PN1079 - 5 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526